Utah statutes.
16-4-304.   Power of sale.
The service or mailing and publication of the notice of sale required under
Section 16-4-303 gives a corporation power to sell and convey all the shares
described in the notice of sale upon which any delinquent assessment or other
amount remains unpaid at the time appointed for the sale.
